Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 1. Interim Publication

§ 1840.
Interim publication.

Within 90 days following adjournment without day of any session of the General Assembly in which articles of amendment to the Constitution have been proposed by the Senate and concurred in by the House, the Secretary of State shall prepare copies of the proposal or proposals of amendment and forward them, with a summary of proposed changes, for publication in at least two newspapers having general circulation in the State, as determined by the Secretary of State. The proposal or proposals shall be so published once each week for three successive weeks in each of the papers at the expense of the State and on the websites of the General Assembly and the Office of the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 3, 1972; amended

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 61.